Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-209
Attorney General; actions against members of Legislature; defense; when authorized.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General, when requested by resolution of the Legislature, to appear for, and prosecute or defend any action instituted or now pending in any of the courts of this state against any member of the Legislature for, or on account of, any words spoken, or any act or thing done, in the course of legislative procedure, or with relation to any act, measure, resolution, report, speech or debate, or other matter had or transacted by the Legislature, or in connection therewith.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 9, § 1, p. 67;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-211;

R.S.1943, § 84-209.